Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. In General

§ 27-4-101.
Semimonthly payments required; method of payment; agricultural operations exempt; payment in case of labor dispute or temporary layoff.

Every person, firm or corporation, engaged in the operation of any railroad, mine, refinery, and work incidental to prospecting for, or the production of, oil and gas, or other factory, mill or workshop, within the state of Wyoming, shall, on or before the first day of each month, pay their employees the wages earned by them during the first half of the preceding month ending with the fifteenth day of the month, and on or before the fifteenth day of each month pay their employees the wages earned by them during the last half of the preceding month; provided, however, that if at any time of payment any employee shall be absent from his or her regular place of labor, and shall not receive his or her wages, at that time due and owing, through a duly authorized representative, he or she shall be entitled to payment at any time thereafter upon demand on the proper paymaster or at the place where wages are usually paid; provided, further, that if the first or the fifteenth of the month occurs on a day which is not a working day, that the last preceding working day shall be the payday, for all personnel who are regularly paid at one (1) location, provided, every employer shall establish and maintain regular paydays as herein provided and shall post and maintain copies of this law printed in plain type in at least two (2) conspicuous places where the notices can be seen by the employees.

Every employer shall, at the time of each payment of wages, furnish each of his employees with a detachable part of the check, draft or voucher, paying the employees’ wages, giving an itemized statement in writing showing all deductions made from such wages. If the employer does not make his payroll payments in the aforementioned manner, then he shall provide such itemized statement on a slip attached to such payment. Nothing in W.S.

27-4-101

through

27-4-103

shall be construed to prohibit an employer from depositing wages due or to become due or an advance on wages to be earned, in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, credit union or other financial institution authorized by the United States or one (1) of the several states to receive deposits in the United States if the employee has voluntarily authorized such deposit.

Agricultural operations shall be exempt from the provisions provided herein.

When work of any employee is suspended as a result of a labor dispute, or when an employee for any reason whatsoever is temporarily laid off, the employer shall pay in full to such employee on the next regular payday, either through the regular pay channels or by mail if requested by the employee, wages earned to the time of suspension or layoff.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 73, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4310; Laws 1923, ch. 36, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 63-114; C.S. 1945, § 54-601; Laws 1953, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-192; Laws 1959, ch. 183, § 1; 1973, ch. 99, § 1; 1975, ch. 100, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Cited

in

Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(2005).

§ 27-4-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1923, ch. 36, § 2, required semimonthly payment except on agreement of the parties.

§ 27-4-103.
Semimonthly payments required; penalty.

Every person violating any of the provisions of this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 36, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 63-116; C.S. 1945, § 54-603; W.S. 1957, § 27-194; Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 36, Laws 1923, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 27-4-104.
Payment of employee quitting or discharged and suit for wages; generally.

Whenever an employee quits service or is discharged, the employee shall be paid whatever wages are due him in lawful money of the United States of America, or by check or draft which can be cashed at a bank, no later than the employer’s usual practice on regularly scheduled payroll dates or at a time specified under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the employee. The employer may offset from any monies due the employee as wages, any sums due the employer from the employee which have been incurred by the employee during his employment. This section does not apply to the earnings of a sales agent employed on a commission basis and having custody of accounts, money or goods of his principal where the net amount due the agent may not be determinable except after an audit or verification of sales, accounts, funds or stocks.

Whenever an employee who has quit, has been discharged from service, or because of action taken by the employer is prevented from working has cause to bring suit for wages earned and due, and shall establish in court the amount which is justly due, the court shall allow to the plaintiff interest on the past due wages at the rate of eighteen percent (18%) per annum from the date of discharge or termination or from the date when unpaid wages are required to be paid as specified in this act, together with a reasonable attorney fee and all costs of suit. Prosecution of a civil action to recover unpaid wages does not preclude prosecution under W.S.

27-4-105

.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 73, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4311; R.S. 1931, § 63-125; Laws 1945, ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 54-604; Laws 1947, ch. 35, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-195; Laws 1967, ch. 88, § 1; Laws 1981, ch. 137, § 1; 1990, ch. 71, § 1; 2015 ch. 129, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2017 ch. 11, § 1, effective February 14, 2017; 2020 ch. 140, § 1, effective March 24, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to collection of unpaid wages generally, see art. 5 of this chapter.

The 2015 amendment,

in the second sentence in (a), substituted “no later than the employer's usual practice on regularly scheduled payroll dates” for “within five (5) working days of the date of termination of employment.”

Laws 2015, ch. 129, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2017 amendment,

in (a), added “or at a time specified under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the employee.”

Laws 2017, ch. 11, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 14, 2017.

The 2020 amendment,

in (b), substituted a comma for “or,” added “, or because of action taken by the employer is prevented from working” in the beginning and added “or from the date when unpaid wages are required to be paid as specified in this act” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 140, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

27-4-507

and 27-4-104(b), read in pari materia, synthesize the common purpose and intent regarding collection of unpaid wages; pursuant to §

27-4-507

an employer must fully pay the wages provided by contract, and pursuant to 27-4-104(b) an employee who establishes the amount of unpaid wages justly due is entitled to 18 percent interest, attorney fees, and all costs of suit. Jensen v. Fremont Motors Cody, Inc., 2002 WY 173, 58 P.3d 322,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2002).

Since the legislature specifically directs the Wyoming Department of Employment to take claims under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-4-104

and does not limit its authority to subsection (a), the Department is authorized to make awards under subsection (b), as well. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

Unpaid wages due. —

Wyoming Department of Employment's grant to a former employee his claim for unpaid wages under Wyo. Stat. Ann § 27-4-507(b) and § 27-4-104(b), was proper because under he was an employee under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-4-501(a)(ii) as opposed to an independent contractor; there was no written contract, the employee did not bill the employer for his services, and the employer withheld tax deductions from employee's paychecks. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

Employer not entitled to offsets. —

In a former employee's claim for unpaid wages, the employer was not entitled to offsets under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-4-104(a) because fuel purchased by the employee with the employer's credit card could not have been purchased on the basis that it was required for employment if the employer insisted it did not authorize the purchase; the payoff of the employee's truck was made prior to the employer incorporating and thus the employment was with a different company at that time; and the employer's supplying the employee with license plates and auto parts did not constitute cash advances. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

Attorneys' fees are recoverable if there is specific statutory authority therefor.

Schaefer v. Lampert Lumber Co., 591 P.2d 1225,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1979).

Relocation expenses deemed “wages.” —

The trial court did not err in awarding attorney's fees on the basis of the statutory construction that relocation expenses are a kind of employee benefit; the term “wages” as used within this section is the same as “wages” defined in § 27-4-501(a)(iii) and the defendant's reliance on the restrictive definition of “wages” in § 27-4-201(a)(i) was misplaced and not applicable to the situation. NL Indus. v. Dill, 769 P.2d 920,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1989).

No attorney fees for contract damages. —

Contract damages that the employee was seeking such as damages related to losses on the sale of the employee's homes and moving expenses after the employee resigned, did not qualify as wages in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann §

27-4-104

, and because it was pure speculation to consider that the contract damages awarded in the employee's favor were exclusively wages covered under §

27-4-104

, the employee was not entitled to an award of attorney fees. Jensen v. Fremont Motors Cody, Inc., 2002 WY 173, 58 P.3d 322,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2002).

No attorney fees to defend separate suit. —

Where an employee filed a relocation claim, and where the employer undertook a litigative resolution by filing a Texas declaratory judgment action, the employee could not obtain attorney fees for the Texas proceeding, since this section does not include legal fees for the defense of a proceeding brought as a separate suit where the employee is a responding defendant. NL Indus. v. Dill, 769 P.2d 920,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1989).

Employee held not allowed to recover attorney's fees. —

See Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984).

Interest not available where damages unliquidated. —

Where employee was awarded damages pursuant to employee's breach of employment contract cross-claim, the amount to which interest could be applied could not be calculated with a simple mathematical calculation; therefore, the claim of the employee was unliquidated because uncertainty still existed as to the exact amount of wages past due, and it was not an abuse of discretion to deny an award of interest to the employee in those circumstances. Jensen v. Fremont Motors Cody, Inc., 2002 WY 173, 58 P.3d 322,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

McNeill v. Park County School
Dist. No. 1, McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981)Mueller v. Zimmer, 2007 WY 195, 173 P.3d 361,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Dec. 11, 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of state laws requiring payment of wages on discharge of employee immediately or within specified period, 18 ALR5th 577.

§ 27-4-105.
Payment of employee quitting or discharged and suit for wages; penalty.

Every person, firm or corporation willfully violating any of the provisions of W.S.

27-4-104

is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each offense.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 73, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 4312; R.S. 1931, § 63-126; C.S. 1945, § 54-605; W.S. 1957, § 27-196; Laws 1981, ch. 173, § 1; 1990, ch. 71, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 73, Laws 1919, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Quoted

in

McNeill v. Park County School
Dist. No. 1, McNeill v. Park County Sch. Dist., 635 P.2d 818,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

NL Indus., Inc. v. Dill, 769 P.2d 920,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 27-4-106.
Assignment of certain accounts and prosecution of certain suits prohibited; generally.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any creditor or other holder of any evidence of debt, book account, or claim of any name or nature against any laborer, servant, clerk or other employee of any corporation, firm or individual in this state for the purpose below stated, to sell, assign, transfer, or by any means dispose of any such claim, book account, bill or debt of any name or nature whatever, to any person or persons, firm, corporation or institution, or to institute elsewhere than in this state or prosecute any suit or action for any such claim or debt against any such laborer, servant, clerk or employee, by any process seeking to seize, attach or garnish the wages of such person or persons earned within sixty (60) days prior to the commencement of such proceedings for the purpose of avoiding the effect of the laws of the state of Wyoming concerning exemptions.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 47, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2516; C.S. 1910, § 3424; C.S. 1920, § 4300; R.S. 1931, § 63-119; C.S. 1945, § 54-606; W.S. 1957, § 27-197.

§ 27-4-107.
Assignment of certain accounts and prosecution of certain suits prohibited; aiding violation deemed unlawful.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any person or persons to aid, assist, abet or counsel a violation of W.S.

27-4-106

for any purpose whatever.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 47, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2517; C.S. 1910, § 3425; C.S. 1920, § 4301; R.S. 1931, § 63-120; C.S. 1945, § 54-607; W.S. 1957, § 27-198.

§ 27-4-108.
Assignment of certain accounts and prosecution of certain suits prohibited; prima facie evidence.

In any proceeding, civil or criminal, growing out of a breach of W.S.

27-4-106

and

27-4-107

, proof of the institution of a suit or service of garnishment summons by any persons, firm or individual in any court of any state or territory other than this state, to seize by process of garnishment or otherwise, any of the wages of such persons as defined in section 1 of this act [§

27-4-106

] shall be deemed prima facie evidence of an evasion of the laws of the state of Wyoming, and a breach of the provisions of W.S. 27-4-106 through

27-4-109

on the part of the creditor or resident in Wyoming causing the same to be done.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 47, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2518; C.S. 1910, § 3426; C.S. 1920, § 4302; R.S. 1931, § 63-121; C.S. 1945, § 54-608; W.S. 1957, § 27-199.

§ 27-4-109.
Assignment of certain accounts and prosecution of certain suits prohibited; liability and penalty for unlawful assignment.

Any person, firm, company, corporation, or business institution guilty of a violation of W.S.

27-4-106

and

27-4-107

shall be liable to the party so injured for the amount of the debt sold, assigned, transferred, garnisheed, or sued upon, with all costs and expenses, and a reasonable attorney’s fee to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state, and shall further be liable by prosecution to punishment by a fine not exceeding the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) and costs of prosecution.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 47, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2519; C.S. 1910, § 3427; C.S. 1920, § 4303; R.S. 1931, § 63-122; C.S. 1945, § 54-609; W.S. 1957, § 27-200.

§ 27-4-110.
Assignments of wages; acceptance by employer; filing.

No assignment of, or order for, wages to be earned in the future to secure a loan of less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) shall be valid against an employer of the person making said assignment or order until said assignment or order is accepted in writing by the employer, and said assignment or order and the acceptance of the same have been filed and recorded with the clerk of the city or town where the party making said assignment or order resides, if a resident of this state, or in which he is employed, if not a resident of the commonwealth.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 120, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3432; C.S. 1920, § 4349; R.S. 1931, § 8-101; C.S. 1945, § 54-610; W.S. 1957, § 27-201.

Cross references. —

For section providing that assignment of unemployment compensation benefits shall be void, see §

27-3-319

.

As to assignment of claims for unpaid wages to the commissioner of labor and statistics for collection, see §§

27-4-502

and

27-4-504

.

§ 27-4-111.
Assignments of wages; consent of marital spouse required.

No assignment of or order for, wages to be earned in the future shall be valid, when made by a married individual, unless the written consent of the spouse to the assignment is attached thereto.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 120, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 3433; C.S. 1920, § 4350; R.S. 1931, § 8-102; C.S. 1945, § 54-611; W.S. 1957, § 27-202; 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

and

20-1-202

.

§ 27-4-112.
Assignments of wages; certain banks exempt from assignment provisions.

National banks and all banking institutions which are under the supervision of the bank examiner shall be exempt from the provisions of this act [§§

27-4-110

through

27-4-112

].

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 120, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 3434; C.S. 1920, § 4351; R.S. 1931, § 8-103; C.S. 1945, § 54-612; W.S. 1957, § 27-203.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 120, Laws 1909, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 27-4-113.
Contracts for alien labor; when unenforceable.

No contract made for labor or services with any alien or foreigner previous to the time that such alien or foreigner may come into the state shall be enforced within this state for any period after six (6) months from the date of such contract.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 37, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1075; R.S. 1899, § 2520; C.S. 1910, § 3428; C.S. 1920, § 4304; R.S. 1931, § 63-117; C.S. 1945, § 54-613; W.S. 1957, § 27-204.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision relative to rights of aliens, see art. 1, § 29, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no person not a citizen of the United States, or who has not declared his intention to become such, shall be employed in connection with public works, see art. 19, § 3, Wyo. Const.

§ 27-4-114.
Contracts for alien labor; measure of recovery; defenses.

Any alien or foreigner who shall hereafter perform labor or services for any person or persons, company or corporation within this state, shall be entitled to recover from such person or persons, company or corporation, a reasonable compensation for such labor or services, notwithstanding such person or persons, company or corporation may have paid any other party or parties for the same; and in actions for the price of such labor or services, no defense shall be admitted to the effect that the defendant or defendants had contracted with other parties who had, or pretended to have, power or authority to hire out the labor or services of such party or parties, or to receive the pay or price for such labor or services.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 37, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1076; R.S. 1899, § 2521; C.S. 1910, § 3429; C.S. 1920, § 4305; R.S. 1931, § 63-118; C.S. 1945, § 54-614; W.S. 1957, § 27-205.

§ 27-4-115.
Contracts for alien labor; third party receiving pay for alien's labor prohibited.

Any person, whether he or she acts for himself or herself, or as agent, attorney or employee for another or others, who shall, in pursuance of, or by virtue of, any contract made with any alien or foreigner, made before such alien or foreigner came into this state, receive or offer to receive any money, pay or remuneration for the labor or services of any alien or foreigner, excepting the person so performing such labor or services, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined in a sum not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), and imprisoned in the county jail for not less than three (3) nor more than twelve (12) months, for each and every offense.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 37, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1077; R.S. 1899, § 5125; C.S. 1910, § 5976; C.S. 1920, § 7272; R.S. 1931, § 32-822; C.S. 1945, § 54-615; W.S. 1957, § 27-206.

§ 27-4-116.
Employee not liable for dishonored check; penalty.

No employer shall withhold money from an employee’s wages for accepting a check on behalf of the employer which is not paid because the check is dishonored unless:

The employer has provided written instructions as to procedures for accepting checks and the employee fails to follow the procedures; or

The employer reasonably believes that the employee has been a party to a fraud or other wrongdoing in taking a dishonored check.

Every employer who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 143, § 1.